District of Columbia statutes.
22-4503.01

Unlawful discharge of a firearm.

Except as otherwise permitted by law, including legitimate self-defense, no firearm shall be discharged or set off in the District of Columbia without a special written permit from the Chief of Police issued pursuant to Section 1 of Article 9 of the Police Regulations of the District of Columbia, effective September 29, 1964 (C.O. 64-1397F; 24 DCMR § 2300.1 ) [CDCR 24-2300.1].

July 8, 1932, 47 Stat. 651, ch. 465, § 3a
as added May 20, 2009, D.C. Law 17-388, § 2(b), 56 DCR 1162

History

Editor's Notes

Section 3 of D.C. Law 17-388 provided:

“Sec. 3. Savings clause. Nothing in section 2 shall affect any action, proceeding, or prosecution commenced before September 16, 2008. Any such action, proceeding, or prosecution shall continue, or may be enforced, in the same manner and to the same extent as if the amendments made by that section had not been made.”